Hawaii statutes.
§264-8 Specifications, standards,
procedures. Specifications, standards and procedures to be followed in the
installation and construction of connections for streets, roads and driveways,
concrete curbs and sidewalks, structures, drainage systems, landscaping or
grading within the highway rights-of-way, excavation and backfilling of
trenches or other openings in state highways, and in the restoration,
replacement, or repair of the base course, pavement surfaces, highway
structures, and other highway improvements shall be prescribed by the director
of transportation. At the request of an applicant for a permit, a copy of such
specifications, standards and procedures, shall be furnished. In prescribing
the specifications, standards and procedures, the director need not comply with
the provisions of law relating to the adoption of rules and regulations. [L
1967, c 163, pt of §2; HRS §264-8; am L 1971, c 15, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next